Utah statutes.
10-3-1307.   Interest in business entity doing business with municipality -- Disclosure.

(1)  Every appointed or elected officer or municipal employee who is an officer, director, agent, employee, or owner of a substantial interest in any business entity which does or anticipates doing business with the municipality in which he is an appointed or elected officer or municipal employee, shall publicly disclose to the members of the body of which he is a member or by which he is employed immediately prior to any discussion by such body concerning matters relating to such business entity, the nature of his interest in that business entity.

(2)  The disclosure statement shall be entered in the minutes of the meeting.

(3)  Disclosure by a municipal employee under this section is satisfied if the employee makes the disclosure in the manner required by Sections 10-3-1305 and 10-3-1306.



Amended by Chapter 147, 1989 General Session

